Washington, session 2025-2026, HB2418.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:Sec. 1. RCW 36.70B.020 and 2025 c 102 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter.(1) "Closed record appeal" means an administrative appeal on the record to a local government body or officer, including the legislative body, following an open record hearing on a project permit application when the appeal is on the record with no or limited new evidence or information allowed to be submitted and only appeal argument allowed.(2) "Development regulations" means the controls placed on development or land use activities by a county or city including, but not limited to, zoning ordinances, critical areas ordinances, shoreline master programs, official controls, planned unit development ordinances, subdivision ordinances, and binding site plan ordinances together with any amendments thereto. A development regulation does not include a decision to approve a project permit application, even though the decision may be expressed in a resolution or ordinance of the legislative body of the county or city.(3) "Local government" means a county, city, or town.(((3)))(4) "Open record hearing" means a hearing, conducted by a single hearing body or officer authorized by the local government to conduct such hearings, that creates the local government's record through testimony and submission of evidence and information, under procedures prescribed by the local government by ordinance or resolution. An open record hearing may be held prior to a local government's decision on a project permit to be known as an "open record predecision hearing." An open record hearing may be held on an appeal, to be known as an "open record appeal hearing," if no open record predecision hearing has been held on the project permit.(((4)))(5)(a) "Project permit" or "project permit application" means any land use or environmental permit or license required from a local government for a project action, including but not limited to subdivisions, binding site plans, planned unit developments, conditional uses, shoreline substantial development permits, site plan review, permits or approvals required by critical area ordinances, site-specific rezones which do not require a comprehensive plan amendment, but excluding the adoption or amendment of a comprehensive plan, subarea plan, or development regulations except as otherwise specifically included in this subsection.(b) "Project permit" or "project permit application" does not include ((building)) permits issued based on compliance with state and local building codes, or a special purpose district's or public utility district's determination of service availability, system capacity, infrastructure requirements, or review of proposed water, sewer, or stormwater civil plans.(((5)))(6) "Public meeting" means an informal meeting, hearing, workshop, or other public gathering of people to obtain comments from the public or other agencies on a proposed project permit prior to the local government's decision. A public meeting may include, but is not limited to, a design review or architectural control board meeting, a special review district or community council meeting, or a scoping meeting on a draft environmental impact statement. A public meeting does not include an open record hearing. The proceedings at a public meeting may be recorded and a report or recommendation may be included in the local government's project permit application file.Sec. 2. RCW 36.70B.070 and 2023 c 338 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:(1)(a) Within 28 days after receiving a project permit application, a local government planning pursuant to RCW 36.70A.040 shall provide a written determination to the applicant.(b) The written determination must state either:(i) That the application is procedurally complete; or(ii) That the application is procedurally incomplete and that the procedural submission requirements of the local government have not been met. The determination shall outline what is necessary to make the application procedurally complete.(c) The number of days shall be calculated by counting every calendar day.(d) To the extent known by the local government, the local government shall identify other agencies of local, state, or federal governments that may have jurisdiction over some aspect of the application.(2) A project permit application is procedurally complete for purposes of this section when it meets the procedural submission requirements of the local government, as outlined on the project permit application. A determination of procedural completeness is not a substantive review of the application and shall not be conditioned on the adequacy, accuracy, or sufficiency of the information submitted. Additional information or studies may be required or project modifications may be undertaken subsequent to the procedural review of the application by the local government. The determination of completeness shall not preclude the local government from requesting additional information or studies either at the time of the notice of completeness or subsequently if new information is required or substantial changes in the proposed action occur. However, if the procedural submission requirements, as outlined on the project permit application have been provided, the need for additional information or studies may not preclude a completeness determination.(3) The determination of completeness may include or be combined with the following:(a) A preliminary determination of those development regulations that will be used for project mitigation;(b) A preliminary determination of consistency, as provided under RCW 36.70B.040;(c) Other information the local government chooses to include; or(d) The notice of application pursuant to the requirements in RCW 36.70B.110.(4)(a) An application shall be deemed procedurally complete on the 29th day after receiving a project permit application under this section if the local government does not provide a written determination to the applicant that the application is procedurally incomplete as provided in subsection (1)(b)(ii) of this section. When the local government does not provide a written determination, they may still seek additional information or studies as provided for in subsection (2) of this section.(b) Within 14 days after an applicant has submitted to a local government additional information identified by the local government as being necessary for a complete application, the local government shall notify the applicant whether the application is complete or what additional information is necessary.(c) The notice of application shall be provided within 14 days after the determination of procedural completeness pursuant to RCW 36.70B.110.Sec. 3. RCW 36.70B.080 and 2025 c 208 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:(1)(a) Development regulations adopted pursuant to RCW 36.70A.040 must establish and implement time periods for local government actions for each type of project permit application and provide timely and predictable procedures to determine whether a completed project permit application meets the requirements of those development regulations. Except for modifications by a jurisdiction provided for in (e) of this subsection, the time periods for local government actions for each type of complete project permit application or project type may not exceed those specified in this section.(b) For project permits submitted after January 1, 2025, the development regulations must, for each type of permit application, specify the contents of a completed project permit application necessary for the complete compliance with the time periods and procedures.(c) A jurisdiction may exclude certain permit types and timelines for processing project permit applications as provided for in RCW 36.70B.140.(d) The time periods for local government action to issue a final decision for each type of complete project permit application or project type subject to this chapter should not exceed the following time periods unless modified by the local government pursuant to this section or RCW 36.70B.140:(i) For project permits which do not require public notice under RCW 36.70B.110, a local government must issue a final decision within 65 days of the determination of completeness under RCW 36.70B.070;(ii) For project permits which require public notice under RCW 36.70B.110, a local government must issue a final decision within 100 days of the determination of completeness under RCW 36.70B.070; and(iii) For project permits which require public notice under RCW 36.70B.110 and a public hearing, a local government must issue a final decision within 170 days of the determination of completeness under RCW 36.70B.070.(e) A jurisdiction may modify the provisions in (d) of this subsection to add permit types not identified, change the permit names or types in each category, address how consolidated review time periods may be different than permits submitted individually, and provide for how projects of a certain size or type may be differentiated, including by differentiating between permits that include a residential land use as a principal use of the land and permits that do not. Unless otherwise provided for the consolidated review of more than one permit, the time period for a final decision shall be the longest of the permit time periods identified in (d) of this subsection or as amended by a local government.(f) If a local government does not adopt an ordinance or resolution modifying the provisions in (d) of this subsection, the time periods in (d) of this subsection apply.(g) The number of days an application is in review with the county or city shall be calculated from the day completeness is determined under RCW 36.70B.070 to the date a final decision is issued on the project permit application. The number of days shall be calculated by counting every calendar day and excluding the following time periods:(i) Any period between the day that the county or city has notified the applicant, in writing, that additional information is required to further process the application, an applicable fee must be paid, or a required notice must be posted, and the day when responsive information is resubmitted by the applicant, the fee is paid, or the notice is posted;(ii) Any period after an applicant informs the local government, in writing, that they would like to temporarily suspend review of the project permit application until the time that the applicant notifies the local government, in writing, that they would like to resume the application. A local government may set conditions for the temporary suspension of a permit application; ((and))(iii) Any period that the local government has completed all possible work on the application but must wait for necessary action by a government entity subject to subsection (2) or (3) of this section;(iv) Any period during which a draft or final environmental impact statement is being prepared following a determination of significance under chapter 43.21C RCW;(v) Any period between issuance of a final decision and the expiration of the applicable administrative appeal period; and(vi) Any period after an administrative appeal is filed until the administrative appeal is resolved and any additional time period provided by the administrative appeal has expired.(h) The time periods for a local government to process a permit shall start over if an applicant proposes a change in use that adds or removes commercial or residential elements from the original application that would make the application fail to meet the determination of procedural completeness for the new use, as required by the local government under RCW 36.70B.070.(i) If, at any time, an applicant informs the local government, in writing, that the applicant would like to temporarily suspend the review of the project for more than 60 days, or if an applicant is not responsive for more than 60 consecutive days after the county or city has notified the applicant, in writing, that additional information is required to further process the application, an additional 30 days may be added to the time periods for local government action to issue a final decision for each type of project permit that is subject to this chapter. Any written notice from the local government to the applicant that additional information is required to further process the application must include a notice that nonresponsiveness for 60 consecutive days may result in 30 days being added to the time for review. For the purposes of this subsection, "nonresponsiveness" means that an applicant is not making demonstrable progress on providing additional requested information to the local government, or that there is no ongoing communication from the applicant to the local government on the applicant's ability or willingness to provide the additional information.(j) Annual amendments to the comprehensive plan are not subject to the requirements of this section.(k) A county's or city's adoption of a resolution or ordinance to implement this subsection shall not be subject to appeal under chapter 36.70A RCW unless the resolution or ordinance modifies the time periods provided in (d) of this subsection by providing for a review period of more than 170 days for any project permit.(l)(i) When permit time periods provided for in (d) of this subsection, as may be amended by a local government, and as may be extended as provided for in (i) of this subsection, are not met, a portion of the permit fee must be refunded to the applicant as provided in this subsection. A local government may provide for the collection of only 80 percent of a permit fee initially, and for the collection of the remaining balance if the permitting time periods are met. The portion of the fee refunded for missing time periods shall be:(A) 10 percent if the final decision of the project permit application was made after the applicable deadline but the period from the passage of the deadline to the time of issuance of the final decision did not exceed 20 percent of the original time period; or(B) 20 percent if the period from the passage of the deadline to the time of the issuance of the final decision exceeded 20 percent of the original time period.(ii) Except as provided in RCW 36.70B.160, the provisions in (([(l)]))(l)(i) of this subsection are not applicable to ((cities and counties))a local government which ((have))has implemented at least three of the options in RCW 36.70B.160(1) (a) through (j) at the time an application is deemed procedurally complete.(2)(a) Any government entity other than a local government, special purpose district, or public utility district, that imposes a fee on an applicant for review of a project permit application, or a portion thereof, related to a residential project must complete its review of the project permit application within the time periods established in subsection (1)(d) of this section, unless the applicant agrees in writing to waive the application of the time period for review. Such a waiver may occur at any time prior to the denial of the project permit application or the exhaustion of the time period for review. If an applicant has agreed to waive the application of the time period, then the provisions of this subsection (2) do not apply to the review of the project permit application.(b) The time that a government entity has taken to review a project permit application must be determined as provided for in subsection (1)(g) of this section, and is exclusive of the time that a local government or other entity has taken to conduct its review of its portion of the project permit application.(c) A government entity that does not complete its review within the required time periods must refund or forgo 20 percent of the fee that it collected or would have collected for its review. A government entity that does not collect a fee for its review of a portion of a project permit application is not required to provide any refund under this section.(3)(a) When a local government requires a special purpose district's or public utility district's determination in order to complete review of a residential project permit application including approval of a preliminary plat or other land division, the review must be conducted as provided for in this subsection (3).(b)(i) A special purpose district's or public utility district's review period begins when a local government provides a complete referral to the district. A referral is complete if it includes civil plans and supporting materials based on the district's adopted engineering and design standards in effect on the date of the referral, and when the referral includes all materials required to constitute a complete application under the district's adopted procedures.(ii) Within 15 calendar days of receipt of the referral, the district must notify the local government and applicant in writing if the referral is incomplete and identify the additional information required. If a referral is deemed incomplete, a district has an additional 15 calendar days from the receipt of the requested information to notify the local government and applicant in writing if the referral is still incomplete and identify the additional information required. If the district does not provide notice within 15 calendar days of the initial referral or of the submission of additional information, the referral is deemed complete for purposes of this section.(c)(i) For routine infrastructure extensions or connections that do not require specialized engineering analysis or external regulatory approval, the district shall issue its written technical determination in the form of written comments within 45 business days of its receipt of a complete referral. A written response may include:(A) Confirmation of consistency with adopted engineering and design standards;(B) Identification of revisions required to achieve compliance;(C) Conditions of service or infrastructure improvements authorized by law; or(D) Identification of capacity, regulatory, or system limitations that preclude approval.(ii) When a proposal involves complex infrastructure or requires specialized engineering review, regulatory coordination, or third-party technical consultation, the time review period for completing the review or issuing a decision may be extended by up to 60 business days over the time period provided for in (c)(i) of this subsection. If a time period is extended in this way, the district must provide written notice to the local government and applicant identifying the basis for extended review and an estimated time frame for completion. No review period may exceed a total of more than 120 calendar days, exclusive of any excluded periods provided for in (d) of this subsection. Complex infrastructure includes, but is not limited to:(A) Sewage lift stations or pump stations;(B) Mechanical, electrical, hydraulic, or supervisory control and data acquisition systems;(C) Directional drilling, boring, or installation within state or county rights-of-way;(D) Construction of new off-site capital facilities that are not existing or previously approved for construction and that are required to provide system capacity beyond a direct connection to existing infrastructure;(E) System-wide hydraulic or capacity modeling;(F) Projects requiring specialty engineering consultation; and(G) Projects in critical aquifer protection areas, where additional assessment is required.(d)(i) The time periods that a district has been reviewing an application under (c) of this subsection may not include any period in which the district is awaiting:(A) Approval or other authorization from a state or federal agency;(B) Right-of-way permits from the state or a local government;(C) Franchise utility coordination or relocation approval;(D) Final land use conditions, site layout decisions, or building design necessary to complete engineering review; or(E) Any other approvals required by state or federal law that are outside the authority of the district.(ii) The review period also does not include any period in which the district is awaiting revisions from the applicant in response to written review comments from the district. The period excluded under this subsection begins on the date the written comments are transmitted to the applicant and ends on the date the district receives revised materials that are responsive to those comments. After an initial period is excluded under this subsection, subsequent excluded periods are limited to those related to review comments arising from revised materials and may not reopen issues previously resolved unless required for public health, safety, or regulatory compliance.(iii) Nothing in this subsection (3) limits the authority of a district to issue additional comments if revised materials introduce new deficiencies or design changes.(e)(i) If a district does not provide written comments within the time periods established in (c) of this subsection, exclusive of any periods excluded under (d) of this subsection, the district must refund or forgo 20 percent of the fee that it collected or would have collected for its review of the application.(ii) Only that portion of the fee attributable to civil plan or infrastructure review under this section is subject to a refund.(iii) A district's failure to complete review within the applicable time period does not constitute approval of service.(f) Nothing in this subsection (3):(i) Expands or limits the substantive authority of a special purpose district or public utility district;(ii) Authorizes the imposition of requirements not otherwise authorized by law;(iii) Creates a cause of action for damages; or(iv) Requires provision of service that cannot be safely or legally delivered.(g) Districts subject to this section shall provide review performance information to a local government that referred the residential project permit application to the district if the local government is required to create a performance report under subsection (4) of this section. The information must include:(i) The date the referral was received;(ii) The date the referral was deemed complete;(iii) Whether the referral was for an application eligible for an extension of the initial time period as provided for in (c)(ii) of this subsection;(iv) The date that written comments were issued; and(v) Whether a refund was issued under (e) of this subsection.(4)(a) Counties subject to the requirements of RCW 36.70A.215 and the cities within those counties that have populations of at least 20,000 must, for each type of permit application, identify the total number of project permit applications for which decisions are issued according to the provisions of this chapter. For each type of project permit application identified, these counties and cities must establish and implement a deadline for issuing a notice of final decision as required by subsection (1) of this section and minimum requirements for applications to be deemed complete under RCW 36.70B.070 as required by subsection (1) of this section.(b) Counties and cities subject to the requirements of this subsection also must prepare an annual performance report that includes information outlining time periods for certain permit types associated with housing. The report must provide:(i) Permit time periods for certain permit processes in the county or city in relation to those established under this section, including whether the county or city has established shorter time periods than those provided in this section;(ii) The total number of decisions issued during the year for the following permit types: Preliminary subdivisions, final subdivisions, binding site plans, permit processes associated with the approval of multifamily housing, and construction plan review for each of these permit types when submitted separately;(iii) The total number of decisions for each permit type which included consolidated project permit review, such as concurrent review of a rezone or construction plans;(iv) The average number of days from a submittal to a decision being issued for the project permit types listed in ((subsection (2)(b)(ii) of this section [(b)(ii) of this subsection]))(b)(ii) of this subsection. This shall be calculated from the day completeness is determined under RCW 36.70B.070 to the date a decision is issued on the application. The number of days shall be calculated by counting every calendar day;(v) The total number of days each project permit application of a type listed in ((subsection (2)(b)(ii) of this section [(b)(ii) of this subsection]))(b)(ii) of this subsection was in review with the county or city. This shall be calculated from the day completeness is determined under RCW 36.70B.070 to the date a final decision is issued on the application. The number of days shall be calculated by counting every calendar day. The days the application is in review with the county or city does not include the time periods in subsection (1)(g)(i) through (iii) of this section;(vi) The total number of days that were excluded from the time period calculation under subsection (1)(g)(i) through (iii) of this section for each project permit application of a type listed in ((subsection (2)(b)(ii) of this section [(b)(ii) of this subsection]))(b)(ii) of this subsection; and(vii) Any information received from a special purpose district or public utility district under subsection (3)(g) of this section.(c) Counties and cities subject to the requirements of this subsection must:(i) Post the annual performance report through the county's or city's website; and(ii) Submit the annual performance report to the department of commerce by March 1st each year.(d) No later than July 1st each year, the department of commerce shall publish a report which includes the annual performance report data for each county and city subject to the requirements of this subsection and a list of those counties and cities whose time periods are shorter than those provided for in this section.The annual report must also include key metrics and findings from the information collected.(e) The initial annual report required under this subsection must be submitted to the department of commerce by March 1, 2025, and must include information from permitting in 2024.(((3)))(5) Nothing in this section prohibits a county or city from extending a deadline for issuing a decision for a specific project permit application for any reasonable and certain period of time specified and mutually agreed upon in writing by the applicant and the local government. If an applicant has agreed to extend the deadline for issuing a decision on a specific project permit application, then the provisions of subsection (1) of this section do not apply to the review of the project permit application. Such an extension may occur at any time prior to the denial of the project permit application or the exhaustion of the time period for review. No local government may require or request an extension of an applicable deadline for issuance of a decision for a specific project permit application as a condition or an option at initial submission of a project permit application.Sec. 4. RCW 36.70B.060 and 1995 c 347 s 407 are each amended to read as follows:Not later than ((March 31, 1996))June 30, 2027, each local government planning under RCW 36.70A.040 shall establish by ordinance or resolution an integrated and consolidated project permit process that may be included in its development regulations. In addition to the elements required by RCW 36.70B.050, the process shall include the following elements:(1) A determination of completeness to the applicant as required by RCW 36.70B.070;(2)(a) The designation of a permit responsible official for project permit applications related to a residential project. This official has the authority to make all final administrative decisions on project permit applications related to residential projects consistent with the procedural requirements of this chapter. If a local government is also the lead agency responsible for the environmental analysis and procedural requirements under chapter 43.21C RCW for the residential project, then the permit responsible official must be designated as the responsible official under that chapter.(b) The local government shall designate, for each project permit application, a single point of contact, which may be a designated official, position, office, or functional unit of the local government and may be identified by a publicly available telephone number or electronic mail address for purposes of applicant communication. The designation may vary by application. The designated official, position, office, or functional unit must coordinate with other departments and with other agencies or government entities with permit review responsibilities as necessary to ensure that a final decision on project permit applications is issued within the applicable timeline under RCW 36.70B.080. The designation of a single point of contact does not confer independent final decision-making authority unless otherwise provided under local ordinance;(3) A notice of application to the public and agencies with jurisdiction as required by RCW 36.70B.110;(((3)))(4) Except as provided in RCW 36.70B.140, an optional consolidated project permit review process as provided in RCW 36.70B.120. The review process shall provide for no more than one consolidated open record hearing and one closed record appeal. If an open record predecision hearing is provided prior to the decision on a project permit, the process shall not allow a subsequent open record appeal hearing;(((4)))(5) Provision allowing for any public meeting or required open record hearing to be combined with any public meeting or open record hearing that may be held on the project by another local, state, regional, federal, or other agency, in accordance with provisions of RCW ((36.70B.090 and)) 36.70B.110;(((5)))(6) A single report stating all the decisions made as of the date of the report on all project permits included in the consolidated permit process that do not require an open record predecision hearing and any recommendations on project permits that do not require an open record predecision hearing. The report shall state any mitigation required or proposed under the development regulations or the agency's authority under RCW 43.21C.060. The report may be the local permit. If a threshold determination other than a determination of significance has not been issued previously by the local government, the report shall include or append this determination;(((6)))(7) Except for the appeal of a determination of significance as provided in RCW 43.21C.075, if a local government elects to provide an appeal of its threshold determinations or project permit decisions, the local government shall provide for no more than one consolidated open record hearing on such appeal. The local government need not provide for any further appeal and may provide an appeal for some but not all project permit decisions. If an appeal is provided after the open record hearing, it shall be a closed record appeal before a single decision-making body or officer;(((7)))(8) A notice of decision as required by RCW 36.70B.130 and issued within the time period provided in RCW 36.70B.080 ((and 36.70B.090;(8) Completion of project review by the local government, including environmental review and public review and any appeals to the local government, within any applicable time periods under RCW 36.70B.090)); and(9) Any other provisions not inconsistent with the requirements of this chapter or chapter 43.21C RCW.Sec. 5. RCW 36.70B.160 and 2023 c 338 s 8 and 2023 c 333 s 2 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:(1) Each local government is encouraged to adopt further project review and code provisions to provide prompt, coordinated, and objective review and ensure accountability to applicants and the public by:(a) Expediting review for project permit applications for projects that are consistent with adopted development regulations or that include dwelling units that are affordable to low-income or moderate-income households;(b) Imposing reasonable fees, consistent with RCW 82.02.020, on applicants for permits or other governmental approvals to cover the cost to the city, town, county, or other municipal corporation of processing applications, inspecting and reviewing plans, or preparing detailed statements required by chapter 43.21C RCW. The fees imposed may not include a fee for the cost of processing administrative appeals. Nothing in this subsection limits the ability of a county or city to impose a fee for the processing of administrative appeals as otherwise authorized by law;(c) Entering into an interlocal agreement with another jurisdiction to share permitting staff and resources;(d) Maintaining and budgeting for on-call permitting assistance for when permit volumes or staffing levels change rapidly;(e) Having new positions budgeted that are contingent on increased permit revenue;(f) Adopting development regulations which only require public hearings for permit applications that are required to have a public hearing by statute;(g) Adopting development regulations which make preapplication meetings optional rather than a requirement of permit application submittal;(h) Adopting development regulations which make housing types an outright permitted use in all zones where the housing type is permitted;(i) Adopting a program to allow for outside professionals with appropriate professional licenses to certify components of applications consistent with their license; or(j) Meeting with the applicant to attempt to resolve outstanding issues during the review process. The meeting must be scheduled within 14 days of a second request for corrections during permit review. If the meeting cannot resolve the issues and a local government proceeds with a third request for additional information or corrections, the local government must approve or deny the application upon receiving the additional information or corrections.(2)(a) After January 1, 2026, a county or city must adopt additional measures under subsection (1) of this section at the time of its next comprehensive plan update under RCW 36.70A.130 if it meets the following conditions:(i) The county or city has adopted at least three project review and code provisions under subsection (1) of this section more than five years prior; and(ii) The county or city is not meeting the permitting deadlines established in RCW 36.70B.080 at least half of the time over the period since its most recent comprehensive plan update under RCW 36.70A.130.(b) A city or county that is required to adopt new measures under (a) of this subsection but fails to do so becomes subject to the provisions of RCW 36.70B.080(1)(l), notwithstanding RCW 36.70B.080(1)(l)(ii).(3) Nothing in this chapter is intended or shall be construed to prevent a local government from requiring a preapplication conference or a public meeting by rule, ordinance, or resolution, where otherwise required by applicable state law.(4) Each local government shall adopt procedures to monitor and enforce permit decisions and conditions.(5) Nothing in this chapter modifies any independent statutory authority for a government agency to appeal a project permit issued by a local government.(6) For the purposes of this section:(a) A dwelling unit is affordable if it requires payment of monthly housing costs, including utilities other than telephone, of no more than 30 percent of the family's income.(b) "Dwelling unit" means a residential living unit that provides complete independent living facilities for one or more persons and that includes permanent provisions for living, sleeping, eating, cooking, and sanitation, and that is sold or rented separately from other dwelling units.(c) "Low-income household" means a single person, family, or unrelated persons living together whose adjusted income is less than 80 percent of the median family income, adjusted for household size, for the county where the household is located, as reported by the United States department of housing and urban development, or less than 80 percent of the city's median income if the project is located in the city, the city has median income of more than 20 percent above the county median income, and the city has adopted an alternative local median income.(d) "Moderate-income household" means a single person, family, or unrelated persons living together whose adjusted income is at or below 120 percent of the median household income, adjusted for household size, for the county where the household is located, as reported by the United States department of housing and urban development, or less than 120 percent of the city's median income if the project is located in the city, the city has median income of more than 20 percent above the county median income, and the city has adopted an alternative local median income.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6. A new section is added to chapter 54.04 RCW to read as follows:(1) Whenever a public utility district imposes a fee on an applicant for the review of a project permit application related to a residential project, the district must complete its review within the time frames provided for in RCW 36.70B.080(3).(2) If a public utility district does not complete its review within the required time frame, it must refund or forgo 20 percent of the fee that it charged, or would have charged, the applicant for the review. A district that does not collect a fee for its review of a portion of a project permit application is not required to provide any refund under this section.(3) For the purposes of this section, "project permit" has the same meaning as in RCW 36.70B.020.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 7. A new section is added to chapter 43.21A RCW to read as follows:(1) Whenever the department imposes a fee on an applicant for the review of a project permit application related to a residential project, the department must complete its review within the time frames provided for a local government to issue a final decision in RCW 36.70B.080(1)(d). The time that a project permit application has been under review must be calculated from the date that the department receives the information necessary for it to begin its review until the department has issued its final decision, and excludes any time period that would be excluded from the calculation of the time that a local government has been reviewing an application under RCW 36.70B.080(1)(g).(2) If the department does not complete its review within the required time frame, it must refund or forgo 20 percent of the fee that it charged, or would have charged, the applicant for the review. If the department does not collect a fee for its review of a portion of a project permit application, it is not required to provide any refund under this section.(3) For the purposes of this section, "project permit" has the same meaning as in RCW 36.70B.020.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 8. A new section is added to chapter 57.08 RCW to read as follows:(1) Whenever a district imposes a fee on an applicant for the review of a project permit application related to a residential project, the district must complete its review within the time frames provided for in RCW 36.70B.080(3).(2) If a district does not complete its review within the required time frame, it must refund or forgo 20 percent of the fee that it charged, or would have charged, the applicant for the review. A district that does not collect a fee for its review of a portion of a project permit application is not required to provide any refund under this section.(3) For the purposes of this section, "project permit" has the same meaning as in RCW 36.70B.020.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 9. A new section is added to chapter 86.09 RCW to read as follows:(1) Whenever a district imposes a fee on an applicant for the review of a project permit application related to a residential project, the district must complete its review within the time frames provided for in RCW 36.70B.080(3).(2) If a district does not complete its review within the required time frame, it must refund or forgo 20 percent of the fee that it charged, or would have charged, the applicant for the review. A district that does not collect a fee for its review of a portion of a project permit application is not required to provide any refund under this section.(3) For the purposes of this section, "project permit" has the same meaning as in RCW 36.70B.020.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 10. A new section is added to chapter 43.21C RCW to read as follows:If a county, city, or town has designated a permit responsible official under RCW 36.70B.060 on a residential project permit application, that official must also be designated as the responsible official when the county, city, or town is the lead agency responsible for complying with the requirements of this chapter related to the application for the residential project.--- END ---